Utah statutes.
48-1d-1308.   Partner of a professional services partnership.

A professional services partnership organized to provide a professional service:

(1)  may include a partner or employee who is authorized under the laws of the jurisdiction where the partner or employee resides to provide a similar professional service;

(2)  may include a partner who is not licensed or registered by the state to provide the professional service to the extent allowed by the applicable licensing or registration act relating to the professional service; and

(3)  may render a professional service in this state only through a partner or employee who is licensed or registered by this state to render the professional service.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

